Mississippi, session 2026, HB1997.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to the Mississippi Development Authority for the purpose of establishing, implementing and making grants under a Rural Broadband Pilot Grant Program consistent with the provisions of Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027.................. ................................................ $ 10,000,000.00 SECTION 2.  (1) Eligible uses of the funds appropriated by this act include, but are not limited to: (a)  Broadband infrastructure construction and deployment, including fiber, fixed wireless or other qualifying technologies; (b)  Engineering, design, planning and feasibility studies; (c)  Make-ready costs and construction-related expenses; (d)  Equipment and materials directly related to broadband deployment; and (e)  Any other costs determined by the Mississippi Development Authority to be reasonable and necessary for the completion of an approved broadband project. (2)  Funds appropriated by this act must be awarded on a competitive grant basis to towns and municipalities meeting eligibility criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority, which criteria must require an applicant to: (a)  Be a town or municipality with a population under ten thousand (10,000); (b)  Demonstrate the absence of adequate broadband service within all or part of the municipality; and (c)  Provide a local match equal to not less than ten percent (10%) of the total project cost, which may include cash, in-kind services, or other nonstate funds, as approved by the Mississippi Development Authority. (3)  The Mississippi Development Authority may promulgate rules, guidelines and application procedures necessary to administer the Rural Broadband Pilot Grant Program. The Mississippi Development Authority shall coordinate awards made under this act with available federal broadband funding to avoid duplication and maximize the efficient use of state and federal resources. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue the warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.